California statutes. Public Utilities Code
An intercity rail project nominated by the department shall be eligible to compete for funding pursuant to Section 99317 if it is recommended in the passenger rail element of the State Rail Plan prepared pursuant to Section 14036 of the Government Code, or an update to that plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 597, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

99319.

(a) If a rail capital improvement project proposed for funding by the department or a local agency includes as an element the addition or improvement of rail passenger service boarding platforms, those platforms shall be constructed in conformity with applicable rules and orders of the Public Utilities Commission and in such a manner that the top of each platform is not less than eight inches above the adjacent rails, unless the department makes a finding that the circumstances in a particular case warrant otherwise and obtains approval
 from the Public Utilities Commission for any deviation from its applicable rules and orders.

(b) The requirements of this section apply to all passenger service boarding platforms constructed with funds made available pursuant to Section 14031.6 of the Government Code, Sections 99234.5, 99234.9 and 99317 of this code, Section 164 of the Streets and Highways Code, and funds made available from the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued for the purposes of rail capital improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 597, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Limited Obligation Bonds [99320. - 99383.]

99320.

This article is not applicable in a county where the transit district has been provided bonding authority by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99320.5.

If the transportation planning agency determines that the cost of an approved claim for capital expenditures for public transportation purposes, excluding highways, within a county is, together with all other approved claims to be paid from the local transportation fund of such county, in excess of the money in such fund for the fiscal year, the board of supervisors of such county shall be notified to call an election in conformity with the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99321.

For purposes of this article, “limited obligation bonds” are bonds payable solely from the local transportation fund of the county. The money, or portion thereof, designated by the transportation planning agency in such fund to pay interest and redemption charges shall hereafter be referred to as “revenues.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99322.

In determining the amount of bonds to be issued, the transportation planning agency may include:

(a) All costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the acquisition, construction, improving or financing of the improvements.

(b) All engineering, inspection, legal and fiscal agent’s fees, costs of the bond election and of the issuance of such limited obligation bonds, bond reserve funds and working capital and bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period of not to exceed 12 months after
 completion of construction.

(c) All costs for equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99323.

The bonds and the resolution providing for their issuance shall state that they are limited obligation bonds payable solely from the revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99324.

The term of bonds issued shall not exceed 31 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99325.

The bonds shall be sold as the transportation planning agency shall determine but for not less than a price which will produce a net interest cost that will not exceed an average of 7 percent a year as determined by standard tables of bond values.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99326.

The bonds are special obligations of the county and shall be a charge against and are secured by a lien upon and shall be payable, as to the principal thereof and interest thereon, and any premiums upon the redemption thereof, solely from the revenues and such funds as are described in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99327.

By resolution, the board of supervisors shall pledge, place a charge upon, and assign all or any part of the revenues for the security of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99328.

The payment of interest on and principal of the bonds and any premiums upon the redemption of any thereof are secured by an exclusive pledge, charge, and lien upon all or the designated portion of the revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99329.

The revenues and any interest earned on the revenues constitute a trust fund for the security and payment of the interest on and principal of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99330.

So long as any bonds or interest thereon are unpaid following their maturity, the revenues or the designated portion and interest thereon shall not be used for any other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99331.

If the interest and principal of the bonds and all charges to protect or secure them are paid when due, an amount or amounts for other purposes may be apportioned from the revenues or the designated portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99332.

Bonds of the same issue shall be equally secured by a pledge, charge, and lien upon the revenues specified in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, without priority for number, or date of bonds, of sale, of execution, or of delivery pursuant to this chapter and the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds; except that any county, with the consent of the transportation planning agency, may authorize the issuance of bonds of different series and may provide that the bonds in any series shall, to the extent and in the manner prescribed in the resolution, be subordinated and be junior in standing, with respect to the payment of principal and interest
 and the security thereof, to such other bonds as may be specified in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99333.

The general fund or any other fund of the county shall not be liable for the payment of the bonds or their interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99334.

The general credit or taxing power of the county, other than the sales and use tax as herein provided, shall not be liable for the payment of the bonds or their interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99335.

The holder of the bonds or coupons shall not compel the exercise of the taxing power by the county, other than the sales and use tax as herein provided, or the forfeiture of its property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99336.

The principal of and interest on the bonds and any premiums upon the redemption of any thereof are not a debt of the county, nor a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien, or encumbrance upon any of its property, or upon any of its income, receipts, or revenues, except the revenues that may be legally applied, pledged, or otherwise made available to their payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99337.

Every bond shall recite in substance that the principal of and interest on the bond are payable solely from the revenues pledged to its payment and that the county is not obligated to pay it, except from the revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99338.

The bonds and interest or income from the bonds are exempt from taxation in this state, except from gift, inheritance, and estate taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99339.

In the resolution authorizing the bonds, the board of supervisors may, with the consent of the transportation planning agency, insert any of the provisions authorized by this article, which shall become a part of the contract with the bondholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99340.

The transportation planning agency may provide for limitations on:

(a) The purpose to which the proceeds of sale of any issue of bonds may be applied.

(b) The issuance of additional bonds for the same purpose and the lien of additional bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99341.

The transportation planning agency may provide for events of default and terms upon which the bonds may be declared due before maturity and the terms upon which the declaration and its consequences may be waived.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99342.

The transportation planning agency may provide for the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the county’s breach of any covenants, conditions, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99343.

The transportation planning agency may provide for the vesting in a trustee of the right to enforce covenants to secure payment of or in relation to the bonds, and the trustee’s powers and duties and the limitation of his liabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99344.

The transportation planning agency may provide for the terms upon which the bondholders or any percentage of them may enforce covenants or duties imposed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99345.

The transportation planning agency may require the board of supervisors to provide in the resolution for a procedure for amending or abrogating the terms of the resolution with the consent of the holders of a specified number of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99346.

Any resolution containing such a procedure may also provide for meetings of bondholders or for their written assent without a meeting and the manner of consenting, with or without a meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99347.

The resolution shall specifically state the effect of amendment upon the rights of the holders of all of the bonds and attached or detached interest coupons and shall be binding upon the holders of all of the bonds and coupons issued pursuant to the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99348.

The transportation planning agency may provide for any other acts and things necessary, convenient or desirable to secure the bonds or tending to make them more marketable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99349.

The county shall pay or cause to be paid the principal and interest of the bonds on the date, at the place, and in the manner mentioned in the bonds and coupons and in accordance with the resolution authorizing their issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99350.

During the period that any of the bonds and the interest thereon are unpaid, the county shall prescribe, revise and collect taxes in the manner provided by Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99351.

After making allowances for contingencies and error in the estimates, the taxes, for the respective purposes hereinafter set forth, shall be at least sufficient to pay the following amounts in the order set forth:

(a) The interest on and principal of the bonds as they become due and payable. 

(b) All payments required for compliance with the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or any other contract with the bondholders, including the creation of sinking and reserve funds.

(c) All payments to meet any other obligations of the county which are charges, liens, or encumbrances upon the revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99352.

A separate, distinct and special account shall be created at or before the issuance of the bonds, which shall be maintained continuously in the local transportation fund during the time that any of the bonds or the interest thereon are outstanding and unpaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99353.

All designated revenues shall be deposited in the special account and payments shall be made therefrom as provided in Section 99351.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99354.

The county shall preserve and protect the security of the bonds and the rights of the bondholders and warrant and defend their rights against all claims and demands of all persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99355.

In order to fully preserve and protect the priority and security of the bonds, the county shall pay from the special account in the local transportation fund and discharge all lawful claims for labor, materials and supplies, which if unpaid may become a lien or charge upon the designated revenues prior or superior to the lien of the bonds or impair the security of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99356.

The county shall hold in trust the revenues pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of the bondholders and shall apply the same pursuant to the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or to the resolution as modified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99357.

The county may invest funds held in reserve, or in any sinking fund, or funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which counties may legally invest funds subject to their control. No such investment shall be made in contravention of any covenant or agreement in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any outstanding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99358.

The county shall keep proper books of record and accounts of the revenues, separate from all other records and accounts, in which complete and correct entries shall be made of all transactions relating to the revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99359.

At all times the books shall be subject to the inspection of the holders of not less than 10 percent of the outstanding bonds or their representatives authorized in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99360.

The county shall cause to be published a summary statement showing the amount of revenues deposited which are required as security for payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds, the disbursements from such revenues in reasonable detail, and a general financial statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99361.

The statement shall be published annually, not more than 120 days after the close of each fiscal year. The county shall furnish a copy of the statement to any bondholder upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99362.

In the resolution authorizing the bonds, the county may agree that the statement shall be prepared or audited by an independent certified public accountant and shall be in the form and contain the detail specified in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99363.

The duties set forth in this article do not require the county to expend any funds other than revenues pledged to secure payment of the principal of or interest on bonds as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99364.

A fiscal or paying agent may be appointed as now or as may hereafter be provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 54550), Chapter 6, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99365.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99366.

Bondholders shall have the remedies as now or as may hereafter be provided in Article 10 (commencing with Section 54640), Chapter 6, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99367.

The bonds may be refunded in the manner now or as may hereafter be provided in Article 11 (commencing with Section 54660), Chapter 6, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99368.

Without the issuance of bonds hereunder, a pledge or allocation from revenues for the payment of bonds and interest issued or to be issued under any other law, may be made upon the approval thereof in the manner provided for the issuance of bonds hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99369.

All bonds issued in pursuance of the provisions of this article shall by their issuance be conclusive evidence of the regularity, validity and legal sufficiency of all proceedings, acts and determinations in any wise pertaining thereto, had or made hereunder; and, after the same have been issued, no sales tax levied or collected for the purpose of paying the principal or interest on the bonds shall be held to be invalid or illegal, or set aside by reason of any error, informality, irregularity, omission or defect in any of the proceedings, acts or determinations in any wise pertaining to the issuance or payment of the bonds, and not amounting to a want of due process of
 law under the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99370.

All bonds by their issuance in pursuance of the provisions of this article shall by their issuance be conclusive evidence of the regularity, validity and sufficiency of all proceedings, acts and determinations in any wise pertaining thereto, had or made hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99371.

Any action, suit or proceeding of any kind or nature in which the validity of any of the proceedings taken under the provisions of this article is questioned or attacked, shall be filed within 30 days after the day of the adoption of the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds and in case such action is not brought raising such issue within such period, then thereafter all persons whatsoever shall be barred in any action, suit or proceeding from pleading, asserting or claiming that any of the proceedings or other actions herein specified, were defective, faulty or invalid in any respect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99372.

This article and all of its provisions shall be liberally construed to the end that the purposes hereof may be effective. If any section, subsection, sentence, clause or phrase of this article is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portion of this article. It is hereby declared that this article would have been passed irrespective of the fact that any one or more sections, subsections, sentences, clauses or phrases be declared unconstitutional.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99373.

Proceedings are initiated to issue bonds within the meaning of this article when the board of supervisors, by majority vote, adopts a resolution in conformity with the notification from the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

99374.

At its next subsequent meeting, the board of supervisors shall pass an ordinance ordering the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded debt for the purposes set forth in the resolution to the qualified voters of the county at an election held for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99375.

Propositions for more than one object or purpose may be submitted at the same election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99376.

The ordinance shall recite:

(a) The object and purpose of incurring the indebtedness.

(b) The estimated cost of the public improvements.

(c) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(d) The rate or maximum rate of interest on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 7 percent, and need not be recited if it does not exceed
 412 percent. Such interest shall be payable semiannually, except that interest for the first year after the date of the bonds may be made payable at the end of such year.

(e) The date of the election.

(f) The manner of holding the election and the procedure for voting for or against the proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99377.

The ordinance may provide that the estimated cost stated therein of the public improvements includes any or all of the following:

(a) Legal or other fees incidental to or connected with the authorization, issuance and sale of the bonds.

(b) The costs of printing the bonds and other costs and expenses incidental to or connected with the authorization, issuance and sale of the bonds.

(c) If the public improvements are revenue-producing public works, bond interest estimated to accrue
 during the construction period and for a period of not to exceed 12 months after completion of construction.

If such statement is made, the proceeds of the sale of the bonds may be used to pay such of the foregoing as are stated in the ordinance.

This section shall not be construed to authorize a city to use the proceeds of the sale of bonds for a purpose for which it could not use its general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99378.

The ordinance shall be published once a day for at least seven days in a newspaper published at least six days a week in the county, or once a week for two weeks in a newspaper published less than six days a week in the county.

If there are no such newspapers, it shall be posted in three public places in the county for two succeeding weeks.

No other notice need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99379.

If an election called pursuant to this article is consolidated with any other election, the ordinance calling the bond election need not set forth the election precincts, polling places and officers of election, but may provide that the precincts, polling places and officers of election shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, order, resolution or notice calling or providing for or listing or designating the precincts, polling places and election officers for the election with which the election called pursuant to this article is consolidated, and shall refer to such ordinance, order, resolution or notice by number and title or date of adoption, or by date
 or proposed date of publication and the name of the newspaper in which publication has been or will be made, or by any other definite description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99380.

Except as otherwise provided in the ordinance, the election shall be conducted as other county elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99381.

If two-thirds of the electors voting on the proposition vote for it, the bonds shall be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99382.

When two or more propositions for incurring indebtedness are submitted at the same election, the votes cast for and against each proposition shall be counted separately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99383.

If any proposition is defeated, the transportation planning agency shall reconsider the application pertaining thereto. Another election on a substantially similar proposition shall not be called within the county pursuant to this article within six months after the prior election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Other Claims for Funds [99400. - 99408.]

99400.

Claims may be filed under this article with the transportation planning agency by counties and cities for the following purposes and by transit districts for the purposes specified in subdivisions (c) to (f), inclusive:

(a) Local streets and roads, and projects which are provided for use by pedestrians and bicycles.

(b) Passenger rail service operations and capital improvements.

(c) Payment to any entity which is under contract with a county, city, or transit district for public transportation or for transportation services for any group, as determined by the transportation planning agency, requiring special transportation assistance.

If the county, city, or transit district is being served by an operator, the contract entered into by the county, city, or transit district shall specify the level of service to be provided, the operating plan to implement that service, and how that service is to be coordinated with the public transportation service provided by the operator. Prior to approving any claim filed under this section, the transportation planning agency, or the county transportation commission in a county with such a commission, shall make a finding
 that the transportation services contracted for under subdivision (c) are responding to a transportation need not otherwise being met within the community or jurisdiction of the claimant and that, where appropriate, the services are coordinated with the existing transportation service.

(d) Payments to counties, cities, and transit districts for their administrative and planning cost with respect to transportation services under subdivision (c).

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a claimant for funds pursuant to subdivision (c) may also receive payments for capital expenditures to acquire vehicles and related equipment, bus shelters, bus benches, and communication equipment for the transportation services.

(f) Acquisition or lease of vans and related equipment for a farmworker vanpool program for
 purposes of farmworker transportation to and from work, provided the farmworker vanpool program shall use vans or related equipment for a commuter vanpool as defined by Section 37.3 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the regional transportation planning agency conforms with the planning requirements of Section 5306 of Title 49 of the United States Code and Part 613 (commencing with Section 613.100) of Chapter VI of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 609, Sec. 4.   (SB 716)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

99400.5.

Notwithstanding Section 99232, a county or a city in a county in which there is no countywide transit district may file a claim under this article with the transportation planning agency to finance the construction and maintenance of multimodal transportation terminals. The terminals may be located anywhere in the county or city, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 630, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

99400.6.

Notwithstanding Section 99232, the County of San Diego may file a claim under this article with the transportation planning agency to provide express bus service or vanpool service for the purpose of serving work commute trips and for providing accessibility between residential areas and major activity centers.

The express bus service may be located anywhere in the county, but shall be consistent with the plans of the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board and the North San Diego County Transit Development Board, and may be provided by contract with operators, private entities operating under a
 franchise or license, or nonprofit corporations organized pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 9000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

The vanpool service shall be operated by the county with county-owned vans and any claims submitted pursuant to this section for such service shall be approved subject to all of the following conditions:

(a) The amount of the claim to be limited to the actual cost of acquiring the vans.

(b) The local transportation fund to be reimbursed for the amount of the claim within the passenger service life of the vans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99400.7.

Notwithstanding Sections 99232, 99268.3, and 99405, cities within the County of San Diego may file a claim under this article with the transportation planning agency to provide commuter ferry service on San Diego Bay for the purpose of serving peak period commute trips for pedestrians and bicycles. The commuter ferry service may be located anywhere on San Diego Bay, but shall be consistent with the regional transportation plan, shall serve employment centers and high volume activity centers, and may be provided by contract with operators, private entities
 operating under a franchise or license, or nonprofit corporations organized pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 655, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

99401.

(a) The transportation planning agency shall adopt rules and regulations delineating procedures for the submission of claims under Section 99234 and subdivision (a) of Section 99400 and stating criteria by which they will be analyzed and evaluated. Such rules and regulations shall provide for orderly and periodic distributions of moneys.

(b) The criteria applicable to analyzing and evaluating claims for nonmotorized transportation facilities shall be the general design criteria for such facilities established pursuant to Section 156.4 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(c) To the extent necessary to perform its duties under this article, the transportation planning agency shall have full access to the books, records, and accounts of the claimant cities and counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 786.)
-------------------------------------------

99401.5.

Prior to making any allocation not directly related to public transportation services, specialized transportation services, or facilities provided for the exclusive use of pedestrians and bicycles, or any allocation for purposes of subdivision (f) of Section 99400, the transportation planning agency shall annually do all of the following:

(a) Consult with
 the social services transportation advisory council established pursuant to Section 99238.

(b) Identify the transit needs of the jurisdiction which have been considered as part of the transportation planning process, including the following:

(1) An annual assessment of the size and location of identifiable groups likely to be transit dependent or transit disadvantaged, including, but not limited to, the elderly, the disabled, including individuals eligible for paratransit and other special transportation services pursuant to Section 12143 of Title 42 of the United States Code, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), and persons of limited means, including, but not limited to, recipients under the CalWORKs program.

(2) An analysis of the adequacy of existing public
 transportation services and specialized transportation services, including privately and publicly provided services necessary to implement the plan prepared pursuant to Section 12143(c)(7) of Title 42 of the United States Code, in meeting the transit demand identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) An analysis of the potential alternative public transportation and specialized transportation services and service improvements that would meet all or part of the transit demand.

(4) An analysis of the need to acquire or lease vans and related equipment for a farmworker vanpool program pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 99400. This analysis is only required, however, upon receipt by the transportation planning agency of a request of an interested party identifying a potential need.

(c) Identify the unmet transit needs
 of the jurisdiction and those needs that are reasonable to meet. The transportation planning agency shall hold at least one public hearing pursuant to Section 99238.5 for the purpose of soliciting comments on the unmet transit needs that may exist within the jurisdiction and that might be reasonable to meet by establishing or contracting for new public transportation or specialized transportation services or by expanding existing services. The definition adopted by the transportation planning agency for the terms “unmet transit needs” and “reasonable to meet” shall be documented by resolution or in the minutes of the agency. The fact that an identified transit need cannot be fully met based on available resources shall not be the sole reason for finding that a transit need is not reasonable to meet. An agency’s determination of needs that are reasonable to meet shall not be made by comparing unmet transit needs with the need for streets and roads.

(d) Adopt by resolution a finding for the jurisdiction, after consideration of all available information compiled pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c). The finding shall be that (1) there are no unmet transit needs, (2) there are no unmet transit needs that are reasonable to meet, or (3) there are unmet transit needs, including needs that are reasonable to meet. The resolution shall include information developed pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) which provides the basis for the finding.

(e) If the transportation planning agency adopts a finding that there are unmet transit needs, including needs that are reasonable to meet, then the unmet transit needs shall be funded before any allocation is made for streets and roads within the jurisdiction.

(f) The transportation planning agency shall not allocate funds for purposes of subdivision (f) of Section
 99400 until all of the capital and operating funds necessary to meet unmet transit needs that are reasonable to meet are allocated. The transportation planning agency shall not reduce funding to existing public transportation services, specialized transportation services, or facilities for the exclusive use of pedestrians and bicycles in order to allocate funds for purposes of subdivision (f) of Section 99400. The transportation planning agency shall not allocate funds under subdivision (f) of Section 99400 if the allocation replaces other federal, state, or local funds used to fund commuter vanpools by a county, city, transportation planning agency, or transit district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 17.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99401.6.

Upon adoption of a finding, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 99401.5 that there are no unmet transit needs or that there are no unmet transit needs that are reasonable to meet, the transportation planning agency may allocate funds for local streets and roads. The allocation shall not become effective until 20 days after acknowledgment of receipt by the Department of Transportation of documents of the agency’s finding. The transportation planning agency shall, in any case, submit the documentation before August 15 of the fiscal year of the allocation or within 10 days after the adoption of the finding, whichever is later. The documentation shall
 include all of the following:

(a) A copy of the notice of hearing and proof of publication and a description of the actions taken to solicit citizen participation pursuant to Section 99238. 5.

(b) A copy of the resolution or minutes documenting the transportation planning agency’s definitions of “unmet transit needs” and “reasonable to meet,” as determined pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99401.5.

(c) A copy of the resolution adopting the unmet needs finding described in subdivision (d) of Section 99401.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 673, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

99402.

Claims for streets and roads may include those purposes necessary and convenient to the development, construction, and maintenance of the city or county’s streets and highways network, including planning and contributions to the transportation planning process, acquisition of real property, and construction of facilities and buildings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

99403.

In the County of Tuolumne, claims by the county or by a city within the county for streets and roads may also include contributions to the state for the construction and development of State Highway Route 108 from Lime Kiln Road to Phoenix Lake Road, if the county transportation commission determines that it is in the best interest of the county or the city and serves the public interest of the county or city to contribute local transportation funds for the construction and development of that portion of Route 108. The Legislature recognizes that under Section 73 of the Streets and Highways Code that portion of Route 108 is
 required to be relinquished to local control upon completion of the Sonora Bypass and bypass extension.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective July 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

99405.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the allocation for any purpose specified in Section 99400 may in no year exceed 50 percent of the amount required to meet the city’s or county’s total proposed expenditures for that purpose.
